Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2741.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.117, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Reporting. The deleted text begin Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Boarddeleted text end new text begin Department of Educationnew text end must collaborate with the deleted text begin Department of Educationdeleted text end new text begin Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Boardnew text end and the Office of Higher Education to publish a summary report of each of the programs they administer and any other programs receiving state appropriations that have or include an explicit purpose of increasing the racial and ethnic diversity of the state's teacher workforce to more closely reflect the diversity of students. The report must include programs under sections 122A.59, 122A.63, 122A.635, 122A.70, 122A.73, 124D.09, 124D.861, 136A.1274, 136A.1276, and 136A.1791, along with any other programs or initiatives that receive state appropriations to address the shortage of teachers of color and American Indian teachers. The deleted text begin boarddeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end must, in coordination with the new text begin Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board and the new text end Office of Higher Education deleted text begin and Department of Educationdeleted text end , provide policy and funding recommendations related to state-funded programs to increase the recruitment, preparation, licensing, hiring, and retention of racially and ethnically diverse teachers and the state's progress toward meeting or exceeding the goals of this section. The report must include recommendations for state policy and funding needed to achieve the goals of this section, plans for sharing the report and activities of grant recipients, and opportunities among grant recipients of various programs to share effective practices with each other. The initial report must also include a recommendation of whether a state advisory council should be established to address the shortage of racially and ethnically diverse teachers and what the composition and charge of such an advisory council would be if established. The deleted text begin boarddeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end must consult with the Indian Affairs Council and other ethnic councils along with other community partners, including students of color and American Indian students, in developing the report. The deleted text begin boarddeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end must submit the report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over education and higher education policy and finance by November 3, 2025, for the initial report, and by November 3 each even-numbered year thereafter. The report must be available to the public on the deleted text begin board'sdeleted text end new text begin commissioner'snew text end website. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.363, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Rulemaking. The deleted text begin Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Boarddeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end must adopt rules to implement a statewide credential for education paraprofessionals who assist a licensed teacher in providing student instruction. Any paraprofessional holding this credential or working in a local school district after meeting a state-approved local assessment is considered to be highly qualified under federal law. Under this subdivision, deleted text begin the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board, in consultation withdeleted text end the commissionerdeleted text begin ,deleted text end must adopt qualitative criteria for approving local assessments that include an evaluation of a paraprofessional's knowledge of reading, writing, and math and the paraprofessional's ability to assist in the instruction of reading, writing, and math. The commissioner must approve or disapprove local assessments using these criteria. The commissioner must make the criteria available to the public. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.363, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Training possibilities. In adopting rules under subdivision 1, the deleted text begin boarddeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end must consider including provisions that provide training in: students' characteristics; teaching and learning environment; academic instruction skills; student behavior; and ethical practices. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.09, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must adopt rules. (a) The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must adopt rules subject to the provisions of chapter 14 to implement sections deleted text begin 120B.363,deleted text end 122A.05 to 122A.09, 122A.092, 122A.16, 122A.17, 122A.18, 122A.181, 122A.182, 122A.183, 122A.184, 122A.185, 122A.187, 122A.188, 122A.19, 122A.20, 122A.21, 122A.23, 122A.26, 122A.28, 122A.29, and 124D.72. (b) The board must adopt rules relating to fields of licensure and grade levels that a licensed teacher may teach, including a process for granting permission to a licensed teacher to teach in a field that is different from the teacher's field of licensure without change to the teacher's license tier level. (c) If a rule adopted by the board is in conflict with a session law or statute, the law or statute prevails. Terms adopted in rule must be clearly defined and must not be construed to conflict with terms adopted in statute or session law. (d) The board must include a description of a proposed rule's probable effect on teacher supply and demand in the board's statement of need and reasonableness under section 14.131. (e) The board must adopt rules only under the specific statutory authority. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.092, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Requirements for board approval. Teacher preparation programs must demonstrate the following to obtain board approval: (1) the program has implemented a research-based, results-oriented curriculum that focuses on the skills teachers need in order to be effective; (2) the program provides a student teaching program; (3) the program demonstrates effectiveness based on proficiency of graduates in demonstrating attainment of program outcomes; (4) the program includes a common core of teaching knowledge and skills. This common core shall meet the standards developed by the Interstate New Teacher Assessment and Support Consortium deleted text begin in its 1992 model standardsdeleted text end for beginning teacher licensing and development. Amendments to standards adopted under this clause are subject to chapter 14deleted text begin . The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board shall report annually to the education committees of the legislature on the performance of teacher candidates on common core assessments of knowledge and skills under this clause during the most recent school yeardeleted text end ; (5) the program includes instruction on the knowledge and skills needed to provide appropriate instruction to English learners to support and accelerate their academic literacy, including oral academic language and achievement in content areas in a regular classroom setting; and (6) the program includes culturally competent training in instructional strategies consistent with section 120B.30, subdivision 8. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.092, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Reading strategies. (a) A teacher preparation provider approved by the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board to prepare persons for classroom teacher licensure must include in its teacher preparation programs evidence-based best practices in reading, consistent with sections 120B.118 to 120B.124, including instruction on phonemic awareness, phonics, vocabulary development, reading fluency, and reading comprehension. Instruction on reading must enable the licensure candidate to teach reading in the candidate's content areas. Teacher candidates must be instructed in using students' native languages as a resource in creating effective differentiated instructional strategies for English learners developing literacy skills. deleted text begin A teacher preparation provider also must prepare early childhood and elementary teacher candidates for Tier 3 and Tier 4 teaching licenses under sections 122A.183 and 122A.184, respectively.deleted text end (b) Board-approved teacher preparation programs for teachers of elementary education must require instruction in applying evidence-based, structured literacy reading instruction programs that: (1) teach students to read using foundational knowledge, practices, and strategies consistent with sections 120B.118 to 120B.124, with emphasis on mastery of foundational reading skills so that students achieve continuous progress in reading; and (2) teach specialized instruction in reading strategies, interventions, and remediations that enable students of all ages and proficiency levels, including multilingual learners and students demonstrating characteristics of dyslexia, to become proficient readers. (c) Board-approved teacher preparation programs for teachers of elementary education, early childhood education, special education, and reading intervention must include instruction on dyslexia, as defined in section 125A.01, subdivision 2. Teacher preparation programs may consult with the Department of Education, including the dyslexia specialist under section 120B.122, to develop instruction under this paragraph. Instruction on dyslexia must be modeled on practice standards of the International Dyslexia Association, and must address: (1) the nature and symptoms of dyslexia; (2) resources available for students who show characteristics of dyslexia; (3) evidence-based instructional strategies for students who show characteristics of dyslexia, including the structured literacy approach; and (4) outcomes of intervention and lack of intervention for students who show characteristics of dyslexia. (d) Nothing in this section limits the authority of a school district to select a school's reading program or curriculum. Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.181, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Term of license and renewal. (a) The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must issue an initial Tier 1 license for a term of one year. A Tier 1 license may be renewed subject to paragraphs (b) and (c). (b) The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must renew a Tier 1 license if: (1) the district or charter school requesting the renewal demonstrates that it has posted the teacher position but was unable to hire an acceptable teacher with a Tier 2, 3, or 4 license for the position; deleted text begin (2) the teacher holding the Tier 1 license took a content examination in accordance with section 122A.185 and submitted the examination results to the teacher's employing district or charter school within one year of the board approving the request for the initial Tier 1 license; deleted text end deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end the teacher holding the Tier 1 license participated in cultural competency training consistent with section 120B.30, subdivision 8, within one year of the board approving the request for the initial Tier 1 license; and deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end the teacher holding the Tier 1 license met the mental illness training renewal requirement under section 122A.187, subdivision 6. deleted text begin The requirement in clause (2) does not apply to a teacher that teaches a class in a career and technical education or career pathways course of study. deleted text end (c) A Tier 1 license must not be renewed more than three times, unless the requesting district or charter school can show good cause for additional renewals. A Tier 1 license issued to teach (1) a class or course in a career and technical education or career pathway course of study, or (2) in a shortage area, as defined in section 122A.06, subdivision 6, may be renewed without limitation. Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.635, is amended to read: 122A.635 COLLABORATIVE URBAN AND GREATER MINNESOTA EDUCATORS OF COLOR GRANT PROGRAM. Subdivision 1. Establishment. The deleted text begin Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Boarddeleted text end new text begin Department of Educationnew text end must award competitive grants to increase the number of teacher candidates who are of color or who are American Indian, complete teacher preparation programs, and meet the requirements for a Tier 3 license under section 122A.183. Eligibility for a grant under this section is limited to public or private higher education institutions that offer a teacher preparation program approved by the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board. Subd. 2. Competitive grants. (a) The deleted text begin Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Boarddeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end must award competitive grants to a variety of higher education institution types under this section. The deleted text begin boarddeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end must require an applicant institution to submit a plan describing how it would use grant funds to increase the number of teachers who are of color or who are American Indiandeleted text begin , and must award grants based on the following criteria, listed in descending order of prioritydeleted text end new text begin . To the extent practicable, the commissioner must award grants based on the following criterianew text end : (1) program outcomes, including graduation or program completion rates and licensure recommendation rates for candidates who are of color or who are American Indian compared to all candidates enrolled in a teacher preparation program at the institution and, for each outcome measure, the number of teacher candidates who are of color or who are American Indian; (2) the extent to which an institution's plan is clear in describing how the institution would use grant funds for implementing explicit research-based practices to provide programmatic support to teacher candidates who are of color or who are American Indian. Plans for grant funds may include: (i) recruiting more racially and ethnically diverse candidates for admission to teacher preparation programs; (ii) providing differentiated advising, mentoring, or other supportive community-building activities in addition to what the institution provides to all candidates enrolled in the institution; (iii) providing academic tutoring or support to help teacher candidates pass required assessments; and (iv) providing for program staffing expenses; (3) an institution's plan to provide direct financial assistance as scholarships or stipends deleted text begin within the allowable dollar range determined by the board under subdivision 3, paragraph (b),deleted text end to teacher candidates who are of color or who are American Indiannew text begin , not to exceed $5,000 per academic year for each candidate. The purpose of direct financial assistance is to provide cost of attendance financial assistance to candidates matriculating through the licensure program if they demonstrate financial neednew text end ; (4) whether the institution has previously received a competitive grant under this section and has demonstrated positive outcomes from the use of grant funds for efforts helping teacher candidates who are of color or who are American Indian to enroll in and successfully complete teacher preparation programs and be recommended for licensure; (5) geographic diversity among thenew text begin applicantnew text end institutions. deleted text begin In order to expand the number of grant recipients throughout the state, whenever there is at least a 20 percent increase in the base appropriation for this grant program, the board must prioritize awarding grants to institutions outside of the Twin Cities metropolitan area. If the board awards a grant based on the criteria in paragraph (a) to a program that has not previously received funding, the board must thereafter give priority to the program equivalent to other programs that have received grants and demonstrated positive outcomesdeleted text end new text begin To the extent there are sufficient applications, and to the extent practicable, the commissioner must award an equal number of grants between applicants in greater Minnesota and those in the seven-county metropolitan areanew text end ; and (6) the percentage of racially and ethnically diverse teacher candidates enrolled in the deleted text begin institutiondeleted text end new text begin teacher preparation programnew text end compared todeleted text begin :deleted text end new text begin the aggregate percentage of students of color and American Indian students enrolled in the institution, regardless of major.new text end deleted text begin (i) the aggregate percentage of students of color and American Indian students enrolled in the institution, regardless of major; and deleted text end deleted text begin (ii) the percentage of underrepresented racially and ethnically diverse teachers in the economic development region of the state where the institution is located and where a shortage of diverse teachers exists, as reported under section 122A.091, subdivision 5. deleted text end (b) The deleted text begin boarddeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end must not penalize an applicant institution in the grant review process for using grant funds only to provide direct financial support to teacher candidates if that is the institution's priority and the institution uses other resources to provide programmatic support to candidates. (c) The deleted text begin boarddeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end must determine award amounts for development, maintenance, or expansion of programs based only on the degree to which applicants meet the criteria in this subdivision, the number of candidates who are of color or who are American Indian supported by an applicant program, and funds available. (d) deleted text begin The board must determine grant awards in part by multiplying the number of teacher candidates to be provided direct financial assistance by the average amount the institution proposes per candidate that is within the allowable dollar range. After assessing an institution's adherence to grant criteria and funds available, the board may grant an institution a lower average amount per candidate and the institution may decide to award less per candidate or provide financial assistance to fewer candidates within the allowable range. Additionally, an institution may use up to 25 percent of the awarded grant funds to provide programmatic support as described in paragraph (a), clause (3). If the board does not award an applicant institution's full request, the board must allow the institution to modify how it uses grant funds to maximize program outcomes consistent with the requirements of this section.deleted text end new text begin The commissioner must allow an institution to use up to 25 percent of the awarded grant funds to provide programmatic support for the teacher candidates receiving financial support.new text end Subd. 3. Grant program administration. (a) deleted text begin The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board may enter into an interagency agreement with the Office of Higher Education. The agreement may include a transfer of funds to the Office of Higher Education to help establish and administer the competitive grant process. The board must award grants to institutions located in various economic development regions throughout the state, butdeleted text end new text begin The departmentnew text end must not predetermine the number of institutions to be awarded grants under this section or set a limit for the amount that any one institution may receive as part of the competitive grant application process. deleted text begin (b) The board must establish a standard allowable dollar range for the amount of direct financial assistance an applicant institution may provide to each candidate. To determine the range, the board may collect de-identified data from institutions that received a grant during the previous grant period and calculate the average scholarship amount awarded to all candidates across all institutions using the most recent fiscal year data available. The calculation may be used to determine a scholarship range that is no more than 25 percent of this amount and no less than half the average of this amount. The purpose of direct financial assistance is to assist candidates matriculating through completing licensure programs if they demonstrate financial need after considering other grants and scholarships provided. deleted text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (b)new text end All grants must be awarded by August 15 of the fiscal year in which the grants are to be used.new text begin The deadline must be extended if changes to the grant program or appropriation impact the timeline for grant awards.new text end An institution that receives a grant under this section may use the grant funds deleted text begin over a two-deleted text end new text begin upnew text end tonew text begin anew text end four-year period to sustain support for teacher candidates at any stage from recruitment and program admission to graduation and licensure application.new text begin For grantees who receive multiple awards that overlap in the same academic years, the maximum combined total of direct financial assistance that an institution may provide to the same teacher candidate in the same academic year is $10,000.new text end Subd. 4. Report. (a) By August 15 of each year, an institution awarded a grant under this section must prepare for the deleted text begin boarddeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end a detailed report regarding the expenditure of grant funds, including the amounts used to recruit, retain, and support teacher candidates of color or American Indian teacher candidates to complete programs and be recommended for licensure. The report must include: (1) the total number of teacher candidates of color and American Indian teacher candidates who: (i) are enrolled in the institution; (ii) are supported by grant funds with direct financial assistance during the academic reporting year; (iii) are supported with other programmatic supports; (iv) are recruited and newly admitted to a licensure program; (v) are enrolled in a licensure program; (vi) have completed a licensure program; and (vii) were recommended for licensure in the field for which they were prepared; (2) the total number of teacher candidates of color or American Indian teacher candidates at each stage from program admission to licensure recommendation as a percentage of all candidates seeking the same licensure at the institution; and (3) a brief narrative describing the successes and challenges of efforts proposed in the grant application to support candidates with grant funds, and lessons learned for future efforts. (b) By November 1 of each year, the deleted text begin boarddeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end must post a report on its website summarizing the activities and outcomes of grant recipients and results that promote sharing of effective practices and lessons learned among grant recipients. new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Positions transferred. new text end new text begin All classified and unclassified positions associated with the administration of grant programs being transferred to the Department of Education under this section are transferred with their incumbents in accordance with section 15.039, subdivision 7, except as otherwise provided in section 122A.07. new text end Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.70, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. deleted text begin Boarddeleted text end Grants. (a) The deleted text begin Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Boarddeleted text end new text begin Department of Educationnew text end must make grant application forms available to sites interested in developing, sustaining, or expanding a mentorship program. (b) The following deleted text begin applicantsdeleted text end are eligible for a program grant: (1) a school district, charter school, or cooperative unit, on behalf of its participating school sites; (2) a Tribal contract school; (3) a coalition of teachers; deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin (4) a higher education institution; new text end new text begin (5) a nonprofit organization; new text end new text begin (6) a professional organization; and new text end deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (7)new text end a coalition of two or more applicants that are individually eligible for a grant. A higher education institutionnew text begin , professional organization,new text end or nonprofit organization deleted text begin maydeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end partner with deleted text begin an eligible grant applicant but is not eligible as a sole applicant for grant fundsdeleted text end new text begin a school district, charter school, cooperative unit, Tribal contract school, or coalition of teachers to apply for a grantnew text end . (c) The deleted text begin Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board, in consultation with the teacher mentoring task force,deleted text end new text begin commissioner of educationnew text end must approve or disapprove the applications. To the extent possible, the approved applications must reflect effective mentoring, professional development, and retention components, and be geographically distributed throughout the state. deleted text begin The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must encourage the selected sites to consider the use of its assessment procedures.deleted text end Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.70, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Criteria for selection. (a) deleted text begin At a minimum,deleted text end Applicants for grants under subdivision 2 must express commitment to: (1) allow staff participation; (2) assess skills of both beginning and mentor teachers; (3) provide appropriate in-service to needs identified in the assessment; (4) provide leadership to the effort; (5) cooperate with higher education institutions or teacher educators; (6) provide facilities and other resources; (7) share findings, materials, and techniques with other school districts; and (8) retain teachers of color and teachers who are American Indian. (b) The deleted text begin Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Boarddeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end must give priority to applications to fund programs to induct, mentor, and retain deleted text begin Tier 2 or Tier 3deleted text end teachers who are of color or who are American Indiandeleted text begin ,deleted text end and deleted text begin Tier 2 or Tier 3deleted text end teachers in licensure shortage areas within the applicant's economic development region. Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.70, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Program implementation. A grant recipient may use grant funds on implementing activities over a period of time up to 24 months. New and expanding mentorship sites that receive a deleted text begin boarddeleted text end grant under subdivision 2 to design, develop, implement, and evaluate their program must participate in activities that support program development and implementation. Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.70, subdivision 5a, is amended to read: Subd. 5a. Grant program administration. The deleted text begin Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Boarddeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end may enter into an interagency agreement with the Office of Higher Education or the deleted text begin Department of Educationdeleted text end new text begin Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Boardnew text end . The agreement may include a transfer of funds to the Office of Higher Education or the deleted text begin Department of Educationdeleted text end new text begin Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Boardnew text end to help administer the competitive grant process. Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.70, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Report. By September 30 of each year after receiving a grant, recipients must submit a report deleted text begin to the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Boarddeleted text end on program efforts that describes mentoring and induction activities and assesses the impact of these programs on teacher effectiveness and retention. The deleted text begin boarddeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end must publish a summary report for the public and submit the report to the committees of the legislature with jurisdiction over kindergarten through grade 12 education policy and finance in accordance with section 3.302 by November 30 of each new text begin even-numbered new text end year. Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 136A.1276, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Report. An alternative teacher preparation program receiving a grant under this section must submit a report to the commissioner and the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board on the grantee's ability to fill teacher shortage areas and positively impact student achievement where data are available and do not identify individual teachers. A grant recipient must submit the report required under this subdivision by January 31, 2018, and each deleted text begin even-numbereddeleted text end new text begin subsequentnew text end year deleted text begin thereafterdeleted text end new text begin this particular grant receives allocated fundingnew text end . The report must include disaggregated data regarding: (1) the racial and ethnic diversity of teachers and teacher candidates licensed through the program; and (2) program participant placement. Sec. 15. new text begin TRANSFER OF GRANT ADMINISTRATION AND STAFF.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Transfer of contracts, obligations, and unexpended funds. new text end new text begin All contracts, obligations, and unexpended funds associated with the administration of grant programs under Minnesota Statutes, sections 122A.635 and 122A.70, are transferred from the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board to the Department of Education pursuant to Minnesota Statutes, section 15.039, subdivisions 5, 5a, and 6. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Transfer of staff; protections; applicability of collective bargaining agreements. new text end new text begin (a) Personnel relating to the administration of grant programs under Minnesota Statutes, sections 122A.635 and 122A.70, with the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board may be transferred to the Department of Education beginning August 1, 2025, with 30 days notice from the commissioner of management and budget and after approval by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (b) The following protections apply to employees who are transferred to the department from the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board to administer grant programs under Minnesota Statutes, sections 122A.635 and 122A.70: new text end new text begin (1) no transferred employee shall have their employment status and job classification altered as a result of the transfer; new text end new text begin (2) transferred employees who were represented by an exclusive representative prior to the transfer shall continue to be represented by the same exclusive representative after the transfer; new text end new text begin (3) any applicable collective bargaining agreements with exclusive representatives shall continue in full force and effect for transferred employees after the transfer; new text end new text begin (4) when an employee in a temporary unclassified position is transferred to the department, the total length of time that the employee has served in the appointment shall include all time served in the appointment at the transferring agency and the time served in the appointment at the department. An employee in a temporary unclassified position who was hired by a transferring agency through an open competitive selection process in accordance with a policy enacted by the commissioner of management and budget is considered to have been hired through that selection process after the transfer; and new text end new text begin (5) the state must meet and negotiate with the exclusive representatives of the transferred employees about any proposed changes affecting or relating to the transferred employees' terms and conditions of employment to the extent that the proposed changes are not addressed in the applicable collective bargaining agreement. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Future transfer. new text end new text begin (a) If the state transfers ownership or control of any facilities, services, or operations of the department related to the administration of grant programs under Minnesota Statutes, sections 122A.635 and 122A.70, to another private or public entity by subcontract, sale, assignment, lease, or other transfer, the state must require as a written condition of the transfer of ownership or control the following: new text end new text begin (1) employees who perform work in the facilities, services, or operations related to the administration of grant programs under Minnesota Statutes, sections 122A.635 and 122A.70 must be offered employment with the entity acquiring ownership or control before the entity offers employment to any individual who was not employed by the transferring agency at the time of the transfer; and new text end new text begin (2) the wage and benefit standards of the transferred employees must not be reduced by the entity acquiring ownership or control through the expiration of the collective bargaining agreement in effect at the time of the transfer or for a period of two years after the transfer, whichever is longer. new text end new text begin (b) There is no liability on the part of, and no cause of action arises against, the state of Minnesota or its officers or agents for any action or inaction of any entity acquiring ownership or control of any facilities, services, or operations of the department related to the administration of grant programs under Minnesota Statutes, sections 122A.635 and 122A.70. new text end Sec. 16. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Collaborative urban and greater Minnesota educators of color grants. new text end new text begin (a) For collaborative urban and greater Minnesota educators of color competitive grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 122A.635: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 5,440,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 5,440,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner may retain up to $100,000 of the appropriation in each year to monitor and administer the grant program. new text end new text begin (c) Any balance remaining in fiscal year 2026 is available in fiscal year 2027. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Mentoring, induction, and retention incentive program grants for teachers of color. new text end new text begin (a) To develop and expand mentoring, induction, and retention programs designed for teachers of color or American Indian teachers under Minnesota Statutes, section 122A.70: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 4,500,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 4,500,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) Of the amount in paragraph (a), at least $3,500,000 each fiscal year is for grants to develop and expand mentoring, induction, and retention programs designed for teachers of color or American Indian teachers. new text end new text begin (c) Any balance remaining in fiscal year 2026 is available in fiscal year 2027. new text end new text begin (d) The commissioner may retain up to three percent of the appropriation amount to monitor and administer the grant program. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Teacher recruitment marketing campaign. new text end new text begin (a) To develop two contracts to develop and implement an outreach and marketing campaign under this subdivision: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 500,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 500,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must issue a request for proposals to develop and implement an outreach and marketing campaign to elevate the profession and recruit teachers, especially teachers of color and American Indian teachers. Outreach efforts should include and support current and former Teacher of the Year finalists interested in being recruitment fellows to encourage prospective educators throughout the state. The commissioner may renew a grant contract with a prior recipient if it determines sufficient deliverables were achieved and the plans of the firm or organization are more promising than proposals from other entities. new text end new text begin (c) The outreach and marketing campaign must focus on increasing interest in teaching in Minnesota public schools for the following individuals: new text end new text begin (1) high school and college students of color or American Indian students who have not chosen a career path; or new text end new text begin (2) adults from racial or ethnic groups underrepresented in the teacher workforce who may be seeking to change careers. new text end new text begin (d) The commissioner must award two $250,000 grants each year to firms or organizations that demonstrate capacity to reach wide and varied audiences of prospective teachers based on a work plan with quarterly deliverables. Preferences should be given to firms or organizations that are led by people of color and that have people of color working on the campaign with a proven record of success. The grant recipients must recognize current pathways or programs to become a teacher and must partner with educators, schools, institutions, and racially diverse communities. The grant recipients are encouraged to provide in-kind contributions or seek funds from nonstate sources to supplement the grant award. new text end new text begin (e) The commissioner may use no more than three percent of the appropriation amount to administer the program under this subdivision, and may have an interagency agreement with the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board including transfer of funds to help administer the program. new text end new text begin (f) Any balance in fiscal year 2026 does not cancel but is available in fiscal year 2027. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin License applications. new text end new text begin For the Board of School Administrators to undertake the review and processing of administrative license applications: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 289,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 189,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end Sec. 17. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; PROFESSIONAL EDUCATOR LICENSING AND STANDARDS BOARD.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board. new text end new text begin (a) The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board in the fiscal years designated: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 3,933,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 4,033,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) Any balance remaining in fiscal year 2026 is available in fiscal year 2027. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Alternative pathways support position. new text end new text begin To fund a position at the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board to support candidates through alternative pathway programs, including the licensure via portfolio process, and to support districts, charter schools, and educational cooperatives to become alternative preparation providers: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 205,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 208,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Heritage language and culture teachers. new text end new text begin To support the licensure pathway program for heritage language and culture teachers under Minnesota Statutes, section 122A.631, including funding for a portfolio liaison and funding for substitute teachers on meeting days, portfolio fees, licensure fees, and licensure exam fees for 50 program participants: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 319,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 322,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Licensure via portfolio online platform. new text end new text begin To complete the licensure via portfolio online platform to streamline the portfolio submission and review process: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 471,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 321,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end